Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.203

Government research personnel—Requirements.

The licensing provisions of this chapter shall not apply to research personnel of federal, state, county, or municipal agencies when performing pesticide research in their official capacities, however when such persons are applying restricted use pesticides, they shall be licensed as public operators.

[ 1994 c 283 s 24; 1981 c 297 s 23; 1979 c 92 s 4; 1971 ex.s. c 191 s 9.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.